Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
HIGHER EDUCATION FUNDING

23-18-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Higher education is an economic engine for Colorado, helps to create an informed citizenry, and contributes significantly to Colorado's superior quality of life;

In order to ensure the state's ongoing social, cultural, and economic vibrancy, funding for higher education should be based on the needs of the state, the people of Colorado, and the students;

Colorado ranks highly in the United States in the percentage of its citizens between the ages of twenty-five and sixty-four with a college degree, largely due to the migration of college-educated adults from other states and countries;

In order to ensure that Colorado students have access to a postsecondary education that will allow them to compete for jobs in Colorado's increasingly high-tech economy and the global economy, it is essential that Colorado make wise use of its investment in higher education to increase the number of Coloradans who have earned a high-quality postsecondary credential;

It is important that the state of Colorado ensures that all Coloradans have access to affordable higher education, regardless of income, race, gender, age, or academic preparation, and that higher education services are available in all geographic areas of the state, including rural areas, historically underserved areas, and areas with low educational attainment;

In particular, it is critical that the rate of postsecondary participation by low-income Coloradans and minorities, who are currently underrepresented, be increased at Colorado's institutions of higher education;

As part of an affordable higher education, the Colorado commission on higher education should ensure that institutions provide realistic opportunities for students to shorten their time to degree, when appropriate, while also recognizing the challenges that some students face as they work or take care of and support their families while striving to avoid accumulating student debt; and

Colorado's limited state resources must be used in a way that provides incentives for state institutions of higher education to achieve the policy goals adopted by the general assembly and identified in the Colorado commission on higher education's master plan.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

In order for the general assembly to perform its duty to exercise oversight and ensure that tax dollars are being used to achieve stated policy goals, higher education must be funded in a manner that is transparent and understandable;

These goals can be accomplished by the general assembly establishing performance funding metrics that are consistent, predictable, and focused on improved performance;

With a consistent and predictable funding model for higher education, state institutions of higher education will be able to engage in long-term financial planning that will benefit students through more predictable tuition and fees; and

If higher education is funded in a manner that is transparent and understandable, Coloradans, and especially Colorado taxpayers, will more easily understand the benefit realized from Colorado's investment in its higher education system.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 598, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2020:

(1)(c), (1)(f), (1)(g), and (2)(b) amended and (1)(f.5) added, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 821, § 1, effective June 29.

23-18-302. Definitions - repeal.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Applicable fiscal year" or "applicable state fiscal year" means the state fiscal year that commences July 1 after the conclusion of the regular legislative session. For example, during the 2015 regular legislative session, the "applicable fiscal year" means the 2015-16 fiscal year.

"Area technical college" has the same meaning as provided in section 23-60-103 (1).

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education established pursuant to section 23-1-102.

"Credential completion" means the calculation of student credential completion by a governing board based on equal weighting of the total resident student completions of postsecondary credentials in a given state fiscal year. The credential completion calculation includes:

Only credentials recognized by the department and determined by commission policy for purposes of this subsection (4); and

Equal weighting for a resident student who transfers out of an institution with a community college role and mission specified in statute, after accumulating at least eighteen credit hours at the institution in a two-year degree program.

"Department" means the Colorado department of higher education established pursuant to section 24-1-114.

"Local district college" means a local district college operating pursuant to article 71 of this title 23.

"Master plan" means the master plan created pursuant to section 23-1-108.

"One-hundred-fifty-percent-of-time graduation rate" means, for a four-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time, degree-seeking undergraduate students starting in the fall term and graduating within six years with a bachelor's degree from the same institution, and, for a two-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time, associate degree-seeking or undergraduate certificate-seeking students starting in the fall term and completing their declared program within one hundred fifty percent of the normal time to completion, as reported to the integrated postsecondary education data system maintained by the federal department of education. If the integrated postsecondary education data system does not include data for an institution or governing board for prior state fiscal years, the department shall use its available data, as reported by the governing board to the department through the student-unit record database, in place of the missing integrated postsecondary education data system data. The department shall ensure that the governing boards collect and report the data in a consistent manner. A student may be counted only once in a state fiscal year for purposes of this performance funding metric.

"One-hundred-percent-of-time graduation rate" means, for a four-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time, degree-seeking undergraduate students starting in the fall term and graduating within four years with a bachelor's degree from the same institution, and, for a two-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time, associate degree-seeking or undergraduate certificate-seeking students starting in the fall term and completing their declared program within one hundred percent of the normal time to completion, as reported to the integrated postsecondary education data system maintained by the federal department of education. If the integrated postsecondary education data system does not include data for an institution or governing board for prior state fiscal years, the department shall use its available data, as reported by the governing board to the department through the student-unit record database, in place of the missing integrated postsecondary education data system data. The department shall ensure that the governing boards collect and report the data in a consistent manner. A student may be counted only once in a state fiscal year for purposes of this performance funding metric.

"Pell-eligible student" means an undergraduate student who qualifies for the federal Pell grant or for a grant through a successor program.

"Preceding fiscal year" or "preceding state fiscal year" means the state fiscal year that ends immediately before the applicable fiscal year. For example, during the 2015 regular legislative session, the "preceding fiscal year" means the 2014-15 fiscal year.

"Resident first-generation undergraduate student" means a resident student who, until the age of eighteen, primarily resided with a single parent who does not, or with parents or guardians both of whom do not, possess a bachelor's degree, based on institutional reporting data described in subsection (12)(b) of this section.

Each governing board shall collect and report to the department resident first-generation undergraduate student data based on student reporting as to primary residence until the age of eighteen and the educational attainment of the student's parents or guardians. Data collected must be reported in compliance with this subsection (12) not later than the census student data for the fall 2020 term and for each fall term thereafter. The department shall ensure that the governing boards collect and report the data in a consistent manner.

"Resident first-generation undergraduate student population share" means the resident first-generation undergraduate student head count as a percentage of the overall resident student population head count from the fall enrollment census collected by the department.

"Resident Pell-eligible student population share" means the resident Pell-eligible student head count as a percentage of the overall resident student population head count from the end-of-term fall enrollment collected by the department.

"Resident student full-time equivalent enrollment" means the final state fiscal year count of resident undergraduate and graduate full-time equivalent students enrolled at a state institution of higher education, not including resident graduate students at the university of Colorado Anschutz medical campus and graduate students at the Colorado state university veterinary medicine campus.

"Resident underrepresented minority student population share" means the total resident student head count of underrepresented minority students, as defined by the department, as a percentage of the overall resident student population head count from the end-of-term fall enrollment collected by the department.

"Retention rate" means, for a four-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time undergraduate students starting in the fall term and returning for their second fall term at the same institution, and, for a two-year institution, the percentage of first-time, full-time associate degree-seeking or undergraduate certificate-seeking students starting in the fall term and either returning for or successfully completing their declared program by the second fall term at the same institution, as reported to the integrated postsecondary education data system maintained by the federal department of education. If the integrated postsecondary education data system does not include data for an institution or governing board for prior state fiscal years, the department shall use its available data, as reported by the governing board to the department through the student-unit record database, in place of the missing integrated postsecondary education data system data. The department shall ensure that the governing boards collect and report the data in a consistent manner. A student may be counted only once in a state fiscal year for purposes of this performance funding metric.

"Role and mission share" means the percentage share of funding appropriated to each governing board of the total amount appropriated in the preceding state fiscal year pursuant to sections 23-18-202 and 23-18-303.5, excluding the amount appropriated pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (3).

Repealed.

"State institution of higher education" or "institution" has the same meaning as defined in section 23-18-102 (10).

"Total governing board appropriation":

For the applicable fiscal year or applicable state fiscal year, has the same meaning as the total state appropriation for the applicable fiscal year, as applied to a governing board.

For the preceding fiscal year or preceding state fiscal year, has the same meaning as the total state appropriation for the preceding fiscal year, as applied to a governing board.

Repealed.

"Total state appropriation" means, for state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2021:

For the preceding fiscal year or preceding state fiscal year, the sum of:

The total amount appropriated in the annual general appropriations act for the preceding fiscal year to the governing boards of the state institutions of higher education for fee-for-service contracts determined pursuant to section 23-18-303.5, excluding amounts appropriated pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (3), and the amount of the appropriation to the college opportunity fund established in section 23-18-202 for student stipends. This amount is the amount as enacted during the legislative session in which the act was initially adopted, unless otherwise specified in a supplemental appropriations act.

Appropriations pursuant to sections 23-18-202 and 23-18-303.5, excluding amounts appropriated pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (3), that were included in acts other than the annual general appropriations act for the preceding fiscal year that were enacted during the same legislative session as the annual general appropriations act, unless the act otherwise specifies.

For the applicable fiscal year or applicable state fiscal year, the total amount appropriated in the annual general appropriations act for the fiscal year to the governing boards of the state institutions of higher education for fee-for-service contracts determined pursuant to section 23-18-303.5, excluding amounts appropriated pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (2) and (3), and the amount of the appropriation to the college opportunity fund established in section 23-18-202 for student stipends. This amount includes only the amounts enacted in the annual general appropriations act as initially enacted, unless a supplemental appropriations act or another act otherwise specifies. The total state appropriation for the applicable fiscal year excludes any out-year costs or savings from legislation adopted in previous years that the general assembly determines were not accounted for in the preceding fiscal year's appropriations.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 599, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2015:

(9) amended, (HB 15-1254), ch. 57, p. 136, § 1, effective March 30; (1), (9), and (10) amended and (1.5) and (7.5) added, (SB 15-237), ch. 129, p. 400, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2016:

(1.5) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 146, § 21, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 822, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (18)(b)(II), (21)(b), and (22)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsections (18)(b), (21), and (22)(b), respectively, effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2020, p. 822.)

23-18-303. Fee-for-service contracts - authorization - performance funding - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 600, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 146, § 22, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(3)(d) and (7) amended, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 605, § 17, effective April 25.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (9) added, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 827, § 3, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2020, p. 827.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1206, see section 1 of chapter 133, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

23-18-303.5. Fee-for-service contracts - authorization - performance funding - repeal.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the governing board of a state institution of higher education may annually negotiate a fee-for-service contract with the department pursuant to this section for the delivery of higher education services by the institution for the benefit of the state and its residents. Specialty education programs, area technical colleges, and local district colleges are funded pursuant to the provisions of section 23-18-304.

Each governing board's annual fee-for-service contract includes the amount of funding appropriated to the governing board pursuant to this section, plus any amount appropriated to the governing board pursuant to sections 23-18-304 and 23-18-308, minus the amount of funding appropriated to the governing board for college opportunity fund stipends pursuant to section 23-18-202.

Ongoing additional funding. Prior to calculating performance funding recommendations pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the commission, in conjunction with the department and in collaboration with the governing boards, may recommend an additional amount of funding pursuant to this subsection (2) for an institution, which amount is ongoing base funding for the receiving institution and is included in the calculation of funding pursuant to this part 3 in subsequent state fiscal years. The commission may recommend an additional amount of funding for the following purposes:

To increase appropriations over the previous state fiscal year in order to make progress toward master plan goals, which may include addressing base funding disparities or funding priorities not addressed through the performance funding metrics. The commission shall focus its recommendations on broad institutional, systemwide, or state policy goals.

To recognize an institution's additional costs related to or associated with educating and providing services to resident first-generation undergraduate students.

If the commission recommends additional funding for an institution or institutions pursuant to this subsection (2)(b), funding is calculated for an institution by dividing the institution's resident first-generation undergraduate student head count, based on the most recent census data collected by the department pursuant to section 23-18-302 (12)(b), by the institution's overall resident undergraduate student population head count from the fall census, and then multiplying the quotient by the institution's resident first-generation undergraduate student head count, resulting in the institution's "calibrated first-generation undergraduate student head count". An institution's percentage share of additional funding pursuant to this subsection (2)(b) is then determined by dividing the institution's calibrated first-generation undergraduate student head count by the sum of the calibrated first-generation undergraduate student head counts for all institutions that receive additional funding pursuant to this subsection (2)(b).

Temporary additional funding. After calculating funding recommendations pursuant to subsections (2) and (4) of this section, the commission, in conjunction with the department and in collaboration with the governing boards, may recommend an additional amount of temporary funding pursuant to this subsection (3) for an institution for purposes of making progress toward goals identified in the systemwide master planning process set forth in section 23-1-108 or other areas as identified by the commission. Additional funding received pursuant to this subsection (3) must be allocated for a specific period of time, is not ongoing base funding, and is not included in the calculation of funding pursuant to this part 3 in subsequent state fiscal years or in the calculation of the total state appropriation made pursuant to this part 3.

Performance funding metrics.

After calculating funding recommendations pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the commission, in conjunction with the department and in collaboration with the governing boards, shall calculate performance funding for each governing board based on the rate of change over time in the performance of the institutions overseen by the governing board on the performance funding metrics specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section. The recommendation for performance funding may reflect a change in the total state appropriation, less the amount appropriated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, from the preceding state fiscal year.

The performance funding metrics include:

Resident student full-time equivalent enrollment;

Credential completion;

Resident Pell-eligible student population share;

Resident underrepresented minority student population share;

Retention rate;

One-hundred-percent-of-time graduation rate;

One-hundred-fifty-percent-of-time graduation rate; and

Resident first-generation undergraduate student population share.

Beginning with the 2021-22 state fiscal year, in preparing budget recommendations, the commission, in conjunction with the department and in collaboration with the governing boards, may annually identify the portion of total performance funding that is allocated to each performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the joint budget committee, after considering the commission's budget recommendations, shall determine the portion of total performance funding for the applicable state fiscal year that is allocated to each performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section. Each governing board's share of the funding allocated for each performance funding metric is determined using the calculation set forth in subsection (5) of this section.

Performance funding calculation.

The amount of performance funding that a governing board receives for each performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section is based on the rate of change over time in the performance of the institutions overseen by the governing board on the performance funding metric. The rate of change for each performance funding metric is calculated annually for a governing board by dividing the average of the four most recent years of actual data reported by the governing board for the metric by the average of the three oldest of the four years of actual data reported by the governing board for the metric. The rate of change for the performance funding metric is then multiplied by each governing board's role and mission share, resulting in the "governing board role and mission adjusted share" for the performance funding metric. The total of the governing board role and mission adjusted shares for all governing boards is the "total role and mission adjusted share" for the performance funding metric. Each governing board's allocation for the performance funding metric is then determined by dividing the governing board's role and mission adjusted share for the performance funding metric by the total role and mission adjusted share for the performance funding metric, ensuring that the total amount of funding distributed through the performance funding metric does not exceed the amount of funding allocated for the performance funding metric.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (5)(a) of this section to the contrary, for purposes of appropriations for the 2021-22 through 2024-25 state fiscal years, an institution's rate of change in performance for purposes of the performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b)(VIII) of this section is based on the percentage change in the first-generation student head count from one year to the next using the institution's definition of a first-generation student, so long as the definition is consistent for both state fiscal years used in the calculation. The department shall calculate each institution's rate of change in performance for the performance funding metric specified in subsection (4)(b)(VIII) of this section using:

The most recent two years of available, actual end-of-fall-term enrollment data reported by the governing board to the department; and

The lesser of the actual year-to-year percentage change in the first-generation student head count or two and one-half percent.

For each of the state fiscal years 2021-22 through 2024-25, the commission may recommend, and the joint budget committee may adopt, a change to the two and one-half percent limitation on the rate of change specified in subsection (5)(b)(I)(B) of this section.

This subsection (5)(b) is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

The amount of any change in funding appropriated to a governing board for the state fiscal year pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not included in calculating the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable state fiscal year for purposes of section 23-18-304.

When requesting or determining a change in performance funding pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and tuition spending authority for governing boards, the department and the joint budget committee shall consider, at a minimum, cost increases to base funding at all institutions, including those related to common policies annually submitted in the governor's November 1 budget request and adopted by the joint budget committee, and the commission's master plan goals.

The board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines may study and recommend to the general assembly a different funding structure, including but not limited to a special purpose authority as defined in section 24-77-102 (15), that strengthens the institution and its specialized educational programs while ensuring academic quality and continued opportunities for resident students who meet the admissions criteria of the institution.

Nothing in this part 3 precludes a governing board, local district college, or area technical college from making a funding request to the commission.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 827, § 4, effective June 29.

23-18-304. Funding for specialty education programs - area technical colleges - local district colleges - repeal.

For the 2015-16 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the board of regents of the university of Colorado may annually negotiate a fee-for-service contract with the department for the delivery of specialty education services provided by the health sciences center campus of the university of Colorado, established pursuant to section 23-20-101. For the 2015-16 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system may annually negotiate fee-for-service contracts with the department for the delivery of specialty education services pursuant to part 3 and parts 5 to 8 of article 31 of this title, and the veterinary medicine program at Colorado state university, established pursuant to section 23-31-101. The amount of each fee-for-service contract negotiated pursuant to this section must be equal to the amount of the fee-for-service contract for the campus, service, or program for the preceding state fiscal year, increased or decreased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable state fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year.
(1) (a) (I) For the 2015-16 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the board of regents of the university of Colorado may annually negotiate a fee-for-service contract with the department for the delivery of specialty education services provided by the health sciences center campus of the university of Colorado, established pursuant to section 23-20-101. For the 2015-16 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system may annually negotiate fee-for-service contracts with the department for the delivery of specialty education services pursuant to part 3 and parts 5 to 8 of article 31 of this title, and the veterinary medicine program at Colorado state university, established pursuant to section 23-31-101. The amount of each fee-for-service contract negotiated pursuant to this section must be equal to the amount of the fee-for-service contract for the campus, service, or program for the preceding state fiscal year, increased or decreased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable state fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) to the contrary, the fee-for-service contract for the health sciences center campus of the university of Colorado and the veterinary medicine program at Colorado state university may increase by a percentage that is greater than the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year and may decrease by a percentage that is less than the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year. In determining the amount of the fee-for-service contracts, the department shall take into account the fact that the health sciences center campus at the university of Colorado and the veterinary medicine program at Colorado state university are high-cost, low-enrollment programs.

If, upon the recommendation of the commission and the department, the joint budget committee determines that an educational program that is not included in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) should receive funding as a specialty education program pursuant to this section, the joint budget committee may introduce legislation that designates the program as a specialty education program funded pursuant to this section.

Specialty education services provided by the health sciences center campus at the university of Colorado as authorized by subsection (1)(a) of this section include care provided by the faculty of the health sciences center campus at the university of Colorado that are eligible for payment pursuant to section 25.5-4-401.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section for the 2019-20, 2020-21, and any subsequent state fiscal years, as long as the increased reimbursements and payments pursuant to the federal "Families First Coronavirus Response Act", Pub.L. 116-127, are still available, the appropriations to the university of Colorado for fee-for-service contracts for the services provided pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section are reduced by the amount of the federal participation received that exceeds fifty percent pursuant to the federal"Families First Coronavirus Response Act", Pub.L. 116-127, or any amendment thereto.

This subsection (1)(c)(II) is repealed, effective December 31, 2024.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, for the 2015-16 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the direct grants made to eligible area technical colleges pursuant to part 3 of article 71 of this title 23 for a state fiscal year must be equal to the amount of the grants made in the preceding state fiscal year, increased or decreased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable state fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year.

The commission may recommend as part of its budget request that:

Direct grants to area technical colleges increase by a percentage that is greater than the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year or decrease by a percentage that is less than the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year; and

In addition to the amount received pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b)(I) of this section, one or more area technical colleges receive additional money for grants pursuant to section 23-71-304.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), for the 2015-16 state fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of the direct grant made to Colorado mountain college and the amount of the direct grant made to Aims community college, as provided in part 3 of article 71 of this title, for a state fiscal year must be equal to the amount of the direct grant made to each institution in the preceding state fiscal year, increased or decreased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable state fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year.

The commission may recommend as part of its budget request for Colorado mountain college and Aims community college that the direct grant to either or both institutions increase by a percentage that is greater than the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year or decrease by a percentage that is less than the percentage change in the total state appropriation for the applicable fiscal year from the total state appropriation for the preceding state fiscal year.

Colorado mountain college may elect to participate in the funding provisions specified in section 23-18-303.5 in lieu of the funding provisions specified in subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) of this section. Colorado mountain college must notify the commission by August 1 of its intention to participate in the funding provisions specified in section 23-18-303.5 for the following state fiscal year. If Colorado mountain college elects to participate in the funding provisions of section 23-18-303.5, the department shall apply the funding provisions of section 23-18-303.5 to Colorado mountain college in the same manner as they are applied to all other institutions, and Colorado mountain college must receive levels of funding that are comparable to the funding received by the governing boards in accordance with the provisions of section 23-18-303.5.

The governing boards of institutions with specialty education programs, the area technical colleges, the local district colleges, and the commission are encouraged to develop funding models that include specific performance metrics to ensure that these programs and institutions are meeting the policy goals established by the general assembly and adopted by the commission in its master plan.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 604, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2015:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, (HB 15-1224), ch. 94, p. 267, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(c) added, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 461, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(a), (2)(b), and (4) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 146, § 23, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(2)(b) and (3)(b) amended, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 820, § 15, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-097), ch. 115, p. 490, § 3, effective April 16.

L. 2020:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 20-1385), ch. 173, p. 797, § 4, effective June 29; (3)(c) amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 834, § 13, effective July 1, 2021.

L. 2021:

(1)(c)(II) amended, (SB 21-213), ch. 88, p. 365, § 4, effective May 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-097, see section 1 of chapter 115, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

23-18-305. Total appropriations - adjustments - fiscal emergency - resolution - financial hardship - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 605, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 15-237), ch. 129, p. 402, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2017:

(4) repealed, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 821, § 16, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(5) added, (SB 18-262), ch. 294, p. 1801, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

(6) added, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 831, § 5, effective June 29.

23-18-306. Duties and powers of the commission - budget provisions - periodic review of funding formula - report.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the department and commission shall submit a budget request by November 1 of each year that includes:

A detailed description of requests for additional ongoing and temporary funding pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (2) and (3) and recommendations for additional funding, if any; and

Recommendations for:

Changes in the amount of performance funding pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (4), if any;

The percentage allocation of performance funding among the performance funding metrics specified in section 23-18-303.5 (4)(b);

Additional funding for fee-for-service contracts pursuant to section 23-18-304, if any; and

Tuition spending authority for the state institutions of higher education.

The department's and commission's budget must include:

A detailed calculation of the funding recommended for each governing board, local district college, and area technical college pursuant to sections 23-18-303.5, 23-18-304, and 23-18-308, as applicable; and

A document, developed in collaboration with the governing boards, local district colleges, and area technical colleges, that identifies the annual change in funding received by all institutions pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 (2) and clearly and separately identifies the annual change in funding allocated to each governing board, local district college, and area technical college pursuant to section 23-18-304.

The department and commission shall comply with the requirements of this part 3 in submitting their budget request pursuant to the budget procedures specified in part 3 of article 37 of title 24.

Commencing in 2026 and every five years thereafter, the commission shall review the funding formula established pursuant to this part 3 and by November 1, 2026, and by November 1 every five years thereafter, submit a report to the governor, the joint budget committee of the general assembly, and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, containing proposed changes to the funding formula and any recommendations for legislative changes.

In conducting the review required by subsection (2)(a) of this section, the commission and the department may:

Convene one or more meetings with interested parties to discuss the existing funding model and to learn of issues raised by the interested parties;

Conduct an analysis of the issues identified by interested parties and possible solutions;

Engage directly with the institutions to strive for consensus among the institutions on any proposed changes; and

If applicable, develop a set of changes to recommend to the governor and committees of the general assembly as described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement required in this subsection (2) continues indefinitely.

The commission shall adopt any policies or procedures necessary for the uniform application and implementation of this part 3.

The commission, in conjunction with the department and in collaboration with the governing boards, shall identify and make recommendations concerning ways to better measure the success of students who are pursuing a credential or degree and who are not included in the first-time, full-time student cohort. On or before July 1, 2022, the commission shall submit its recommendations to the joint budget committee, which may include a recommendation for a statutory change to the calculation of one of the graduation rate performance funding metrics specified in section 23-18-303.5 (4)(b).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 607, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (5) repealed, and (5.5) added, (SB 19-095), ch. 79, p. 286, § 1, effective April 4.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 831, § 6, effective June 29.